Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:(a) Young Washingtonians who are diagnosed with cancer often learn, shortly before they are to begin the medical treatment needed to save their lives, that the treatment may result in infertility, leaving them only a small window of time in which to decide whether to undergo medically necessary efforts to preserve their ability to have biological families;(b) Treatments including chemotherapy, radiation, and stem cell transplants can result in immediate sterility and subsequent infertility for cancer patients, and less frequently, for those with other diseases or conditions requiring these medical interventions, limiting patients' ability to have biological families;(c) Providing access to fertility preservation services is the only available means to protect a patient's reproductive cells, both eggs and sperm, and remove the impossible choice between life-saving treatments and potential future parenthood; and(d) Fertility preservation is medically necessary to ameliorate the side effect of infertility and is considered part of the standard of care for age-eligible patients.(2) The legislature, therefore, intends to provide coverage for standard fertility preservation services.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, the authority shall provide coverage under this chapter for all expenses related to standard fertility preservation services.(2) The authority or any medicaid managed care organization may not include:(a) Any exclusions, limitations, or other restrictions on coverage of fertility medications that are different from those imposed on other prescription medications; or(b) Any benefit maximums, waiting periods, or other limitations on coverage for standard fertility preservation services that are different from those imposed upon benefits for services not related to infertility.(3) For the purposes of this section, "standard fertility preservation services" means medically necessary procedures to preserve fertility that are consistent with established medical practices or professional guidelines published by the American society of clinical oncology or the American society for reproductive medicine for a person who has a medical condition or is expected to undergo medication therapy, surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or other medical treatment that is recognized by medical professionals to cause a risk of impairment to fertility.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act shall be known as the medically necessary fertility preservation act.--- END ---